Oklahoma, session 2025, SB914.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:

Req. No. 604 Page 1


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma


Regional Water District Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1086.8 of Title 82, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Oklahoma Water Resources Board shall designate


geographic areas to be known as regional water districts and to be


responsible for developing regional water plans, no later than July


1, 2026. In creating boundaries for such districts, the Board shall


take into consideration factors such as river basin and aquifer


delineations, water utility development patterns, socioeconomic


characteristics, existing regional water planning areas, political


subdivision boundaries, public comment, and any other factors deemed


relevant by the Board. The Board shall review and update the


district boundaries as necessary, but not less than every five (5)


years.


B. No later than sixty (60) days after the designation of the


regional water districts under subsection A of this section, the


Board shall designate representatives within each district to serve


as the initial coordinating body for regional water planning. The


initial coordinating body shall then designate additional


representatives to provide regional water planning assistance for


the regional water plan, ensuring adequate representation from the


interests comprising that region including, but not limited to, the

Req. No. 604 Page 2


public, counties, municipalities, industries, agricultural


interests, environmental interests, small businesses, electric


generating utilities, river authorities, rural water districts, and


water utilities.


C. 1. Each regional water district shall prepare a regional


water plan that provides for the orderly development, management,


and conservation of water resources and preparation for and response


to drought conditions in order that sufficient water will be


available at a reasonable cost to ensure public health, safety, and


welfare, further economic development, and protect the agricultural


and natural resources of the region.


2. The Board shall provide guidelines for the consideration of


existing regional planning efforts by a regional water district.


The Board shall provide guidance for the format in which information


shall be presented in any plans submitted by the district to the


Board.


D. Each regional water district shall submit to the Oklahoma


Water Resources Board a regional water plan that:


1. Is consistent with the guidance principles of the Oklahoma


Comprehensive Water Plan;


2. Provides information based on local and regional water


needs;


3. Has specific provisions for water management strategies to


be used during:

Req. No. 604 Page 3


a. a drought of record,


b. a period when flows are at seventy-five percent (75%)


of normal water flow, and


c. when flows are at fifty percent (50%) of normal water


flow; and


4. Includes consideration of:


a. any existing water or drought planning efforts


addressing all or a port of the regional water


district,


b. groundwater irrigation districts,


c. all potentially feasible water management strategies


including, but not limited to, improved conservation


and management of existing water supplies, acquisition


of available existing water supplies, and development


of new water supplies,


d. protection of existing water rights within the


regional water district and modes and procedures for


the equitable adjustment of water rights affected by


the plan,


e. opportunities for and the benefits of developing


regional water supply facilities or providing regional


management of water supply facilities, and


f. voluntary transfer of water within the regional water


district using sources including, but not limited to,

Req. No. 604 Page 4


regional water banks, sales, leases, options,


subordination agreements, and financing agreements.


E. 1. No later than July 1, 2026, the Board shall promulgate


rules to:


a. provide for the procedures for adoption of regional


water plans by regional water districts and for


approval of such plans by the Board, and


b. govern procedures to be followed in carrying out the


responsibilities of this section.


2. The Board shall provide technical and financial assistance


to the regional water district for the development of plans provided


for in this act.


3. The Board, if requested, may facilitate resolution of


conflicts or disputes between regional water districts.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1086.9 of Title 82, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. After a regional water plan is developed by a regional water


district pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Regional Water


District Act, the group shall, following publication of notice


pursuant to the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act, hold not less than one


public hearing at some central location within the district.


B. After the regional water plan is initially prepared, the


regional water district shall submit a copy of the plan to the

Req. No. 604 Page 5


Oklahoma Water Resources Board. The Board shall submit comments on


the regional water plan as to whether the plan meets the


requirements of Section 1 of this act.


C. 1. If no interregional conflicts exist, the regional water


district shall:


a. consider all comments from the public and the Board,


b. prepare, revise, and adopt the final plan, and


c. submit the adopted plan to the Board for approval and


inclusion in the next decennial update of the Oklahoma


Comprehensive Water Plan.


2. If an interregional conflict exists, the Board shall


facilitate coordination between the involved regional water


districts to resolve the conflict. If conflict remains, the Board


shall act as a mediator between the regional water districts. Upon


resolution of the conflict, the involved regional water districts


shall:


a. prepare revisions to their respective plans, and


b. following publication of notice pursuant to the


Oklahoma Open Meeting Act, hold not less than one


public hearing at some central location within the


respective regional planning areas.


3. Following the resolution of conflicts under paragraph 2 of


this subsection, the regional water districts shall:


a. consider all comments from the public and the Board,

Req. No. 604 Page 6


b. prepare, revise, and adopt their respective final


plans, and


c. submit the adopted plan to the Board for approval and


inclusion in the next decennial update of the Oklahoma


Comprehensive Water Plan.


D. The Board may only approve a regional water plan after it


has determined that all interregional conflicts involving that


regional water district have been resolved.


E. A regional water district shall submit their adopted


regional water plan to the Board not later than one (1) year prior


to the upcoming decennial update of the Oklahoma Comprehensive Water


Plan pursuant to Section 1086.2 of Title 82 of the Oklahoma


Statutes. Subsequent regional water plans shall be submitted every


nine (9) years thereafter and shall follow the public participation


requirements prescribed in this section.


F. The Oklahoma Water Resources Board shall take all necessary


action to qualify for federal assistance in financing the


development and improvement of regional water districts.


G. 1. The Board may enter into contracts with political


subdivisions to fund all or part of the cost of developing or


revising a regional water plan as provided for in this act.


2. A political subdivision may submit, either individually or


jointly with other political subdivisions, a written application to



Req. No. 604 Page 7


the Board for the purpose of funding regional water planning


research for a regional water district.


3. The application to the Board shall include, but not be


limited to:


a. the name of the political subdivision or subdivisions,


b. the amount requested from the Board for regional water


planning efforts, and


c. any other relevant information required or


specifically requested by the Board.


H. After notice and hearing pursuant to the Oklahoma Open


Meeting Act, the Board may award a political subdivision all or part


of the requested funds that the Board considers necessary for the


political subdivision to facility regional water planning with the


regional water district.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 82 O.S. 2021, Section 1086.2, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1086.2. For the purpose of effectuating the provisions


of this act and the policy established in Section 1086.1 of this


title, the Oklahoma Water Resources Board is hereby authorized,


empowered and directed:


1. To prepare a comprehensive state water plan and decennial


updates thereof for submission to the Legislature and, in connection


therewith, to conduct surveys and cooperate with other state and


federal agencies. Such comprehensive state water plan and the parts

Req. No. 604 Page 8


and portions thereof shall be submitted in final and completed form


not later than September 1, 1975, and, in addition to the foregoing


requirements, shall include a definition of “excess and surplus


water of this state” and a recommended procedure for determining


“excess and surplus water of this state,” which definition and


procedure are to be developed to insure that the area of origin will


never be made water deficient. Subsequent updates to the Oklahoma


Comprehensive Water Plan on and after November 1, 2025, shall


account for and include updates from the regional water districts


formed pursuant to the Oklahoma Regional Water District Act.


The Water Resources Board shall permit representatives of the


United States Army Corps of Engineers, the Bureau of Reclamation,


the Soil Conservation Service and other appropriate federal


agencies, as well as representatives of state agencies involved in


tourism, parks, fish and wildlife, recreation, soil conservation,


public health, agriculture, public utilities and industrial


development to participate to the extent of their authority and


capacity in the development of the comprehensive state water plan.


The Water Resources Board shall prepare such plan and updates in


printed form. Upon completion thereof, the plan shall be submitted


to the Oklahoma Legislature not later than September 1, 1975. The


Board is not authorized to implement the plan or any part or update


thereof except by express authorization and consent of the


Legislature. The first decennial update shall be prepared and

Req. No. 604 Page 9


submitted to the Legislature no later than September 1, 1995.


Thereafter, updates shall be prepared and likewise submitted no


later than September 1 of the fifth year following the taking of the


Federal Decennial Census.


Work on the first update shall begin with the passage and


approval of this act. After completion of the first update, work on


subsequent updates shall remain continuous and ongoing throughout


the ten-year periods between submission of the updates.;


2. To adopt such rules and regulations as may be necessary to


effectuate the purposes of this act.;


3. To make and enter into all contracts and agreements


necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the


execution of its powers under this act.;


4. To receive and accept from the State of Oklahoma or the


United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof


grants of funds and to receive and accept aid or contributions from


any source of either money, property, labor or other things of value


to be held, used and applied only for the purposes for which such


grants and contributions may be made.;


5. To expend income and funds of the Board in the exercise of


any or all of the powers granted to the Board under the provisions


of this act.; and


6. To cooperate with all state institutions, agencies,


departments, boards and officers in all matters relating to its

Req. No. 604 Page 10


duties; and all state institutions, agencies, departments, boards


and officers are hereby authorized and directed to cooperate with


the Board.


SECTION 5. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 268, O.S.L.


2023 (82 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 1086.7), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 1086.7. A. The Oklahoma Flood and Drought Management


Task Force is hereby established and shall be comprised of two


groups, the management group and the advisory group.


B. 1. The management group shall be comprised of designees


from the following state agencies:


a. the Oklahoma Water Resources Board, which shall serve


as the lead agency,


b. the Oklahoma Department of Emergency Management and


Homeland Security,


c. the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and


Forestry,


d. the State Department of Health,


e. the Department of Environmental Quality,


f. the Oklahoma Conservation Commission,


g. the Department of Wildlife Conservation,


h. the Oklahoma Climatological Survey, and


i. the Oklahoma Military Department.



Req. No. 604 Page 11


2. The advisory group shall be comprised of designees of the


following state associations and entities:


a. Association of County Commissioners of Oklahoma,


b. Oklahoma Rural Water Association, and


c. Oklahoma Municipal League.


The advisory group shall also include the resources of all


remaining state agencies and departments available to provide advice


and assistance to the Oklahoma Flood and Drought Management Task


Force, including the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education.


C. The Oklahoma Water Resources Board shall formally coordinate


with the following federal agencies:


1. Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA);


2. U.S. Army Corps of Engineers;


3. U.S. Forest Service;


4. The United States Geological Survey;


5. Bureau of Reclamation;


6. Farm Service Agency;


7. National Weather Service;


8. U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service;


9. U.S. Small Business Administration;


10. Bureau of Indian Affairs;


11. U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development;


12. United States Environmental Protection Agency; and



Req. No. 604 Page 12


13. Any other federal agency available to provide advice and


assistance.


D. The Oklahoma Flood and Drought Management Task Force shall


have the following duties:


1. Developing and recommending state drought and flood


response, recovery, and mitigation initiatives for conditions


determined to be detrimental to the state economy and public health;


2. Identifying drought and flood management areas in the state;


3. Providing coordination and communication among federal,


state, and local entities, including regional water districts, as


deemed appropriate for drought and flood assistance programs,


education, and information; and


4. Performing such other drought- and flood-related assessments


and response functions as deemed necessary.


E. Beginning in 2025, and every ten (10) years thereafter, in


conjunction with the update of the Oklahoma Comprehensive Water Plan


and State Flood Plan, the Oklahoma Water Resources Board shall


coordinate with the Oklahoma Flood and Drought Management Task Force


to update the Oklahoma Drought Management Plan.


F. The Oklahoma Water Resources Board shall prepare an annual


update of drought and flood conditions within the state and planning


and mitigation activities being conducted by the Task Force and


shall submit such report to the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of



Req. No. 604 Page 13


Representatives and President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State


Senate.


SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 82 O.S. 2021, Section 1623, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1623. A. Contingent on available funding, the Oklahoma


Water Resources Board shall prepare and adopt a comprehensive state


flood plan. The plan shall:


1. Provide for orderly preparation for and response to flood


conditions to protect against the loss of life and property;


2. Be a guide to state and local flood control policy; and


3. Include contributions from and account for development of


regional water districts; and


4. Contribute to water development when possible.


B. The state flood plan shall include:


1. An evaluation of the condition and adequacy of flood control


infrastructure on a watershed basis;


2. A statewide list of ongoing and proposed flood control and


mitigation projects and strategies necessary to protect against the


loss of life and property from flooding and a discussion of how


those projects and strategies might further water development where


applicable;


3. An analysis of completed, ongoing and proposed flood control


projects included in previous state flood plans including which


projects received funding;

Req. No. 604 Page 14


4. An analysis of development in special flood hazard areas, as


defined by the Federal Emergency Management Agency; and


5. Legislative recommendations the Board considers necessary to


facilitate flood control planning and project construction.


C. On adoption of a state flood plan, the Oklahoma Water


Resources Board shall deliver the plan to the Governor, President


Pro Tempore of the Senate and Speaker of the House of


Representatives.


SECTION 7. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-604 RD 1/19/2025 5:45:54 AM



























Req. No. 604 Page 15